District of Columbia statutes.
47-3712

Liability of personal representative.

The tax, interest, and penalties imposed by this chapter shall be paid by the personal representative. If any personal representative distributes either in whole or in part any of the property of an estate to the beneficiaries or creditors without having paid or secured the tax, interest, or penalties due pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall be personally liable for the tax, interest, and penalties so due, or so much of the tax, interest, and penalties as may remain due and unpaid, to the full extent of any property belonging to the person or estate that may have or will come into his or her custody or control.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 13, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3712.